Vermont, session 2025-2026, H227.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) by increasing from four to six the number of psychiatric residential
beds that the Department of Mental Health oversees or contracts for statewide,
in addition to those currently available in northern and central Vermont, a
greater number of individuals in crisis will be successfully diverted from
inpatient psychiatric settings;
(2) by providing adequate residential alternatives to hospitalization for
individuals in mental health crisis, Vermonters will have greater access to
residential support and various therapeutic options during mental health crisis;
(3) by expanding peer-supported programming, individuals in mental
health crisis seeking an alternative to hospitalization receive effective,
compassionate, and affordable care;
(4) the State and those individuals seeking support during a mental
health crisis may avoid incurring expensive hospitalization costs; and
(5) by providing more residential beds for short- to medium-term stays,
individuals in mental health crisis will have fewer long-term stays in Vermont
hospital emergency departments.
VT LEG #379609 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.227
2025 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. RESIDENTIAL PEER RESPITE FACILITY
(a) The Department of Mental Health shall issue a request for proposals to
establish a two-bed residential peer respite facility in southern Vermont based
on an existing model that provides supports and services to individuals
experiencing a mental health crisis.
(b) A successful applicant shall ensure that:
(1) at least one bed in the facility may be reserved for stays of up to four
weeks; and
(2) the remaining bed is reserved for short-term residential stays of up to
two weeks.
(c) On or before January 1, 2026, the Department shall contract with an
eligible applicant to establish and operate a residential peer respite facility in
accordance with this section.
Sec. 3. APPROPRIATION; RESIDENTIAL PEER RESPITE FACILITY
In fiscal year 2026, $515,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Mental Health for the purpose of contracting with an entity
to establish and operate a residential peer respite facility pursuant to Sec. 2
(residential peer respite facility) of this act.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379609 v.4